West Virginia, session 2026, SB611.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. Crimes Against the Person. §61-2-5. Involuntary manslaughter; penalty. Involuntary manslaughter is a misdemeanor and, any person convicted thereof shall be confined in jail not to exceed one year, or fined not to exceed $1,000, or both, in the discretion of the courtAny person who, in the commission of an unlawful act not amounting to one of the felony offenses enumerated in §61-2-1 of this code, or in the commission of an otherwise lawful act undertaken in an unlawful manner, unintentionally and proximately causes the death of another is guilty of the misdemeanor offense of involuntary manslaughter and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $1,000 or confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined.